Massachusetts, session 194th, S2629.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 21 to 24, the words "1 of the 
fourteen cities and towns, as defined in said section 1 of said chapter 161A; 1 of whom shall 
have municipal government experience in 1 of the 51 cities and towns" and inserting in place 
thereof the following words:- 1 of the 13 cities and towns, as defined in said section 1 of said 
chapter 161A; 1 of whom shall have municipal government experience in 1 of the 52 cities and 
towns. 
SECTION 2. Section 1A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking out, in lines 32 to 34, the words "(i) one of the 51 cities and towns as 
defined in section 1 of chapter 161A; (ii) one of the 14 cities and towns as defined in said section 
1 of said chapter 161A;" and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (i) one of the 52 
cities and towns as defined in section 1 of chapter 161A; (ii) one of the 13 cities and towns as 
defined in said section 1 of said chapter 161A;. 

of 3 14  SECTION 3. Section 147 of chapter 160 of the General Laws, as so, is hereby amended 
by striking out, in lines 22 and 23, the words "the fourteen cities and towns or the sixty-four 
cities and towns" and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the 13 cities and towns or 
the 52 cities and towns. 
SECTION 4. Section 1 of chapter 161A of the General Laws, as so, is hereby amended 
by striking out the definition of ''51 cities and towns'' and inserting in place thereof the following 
definition:- ''52 cities and towns'', the cities and towns of Arlington, Bedford, Beverly, Braintree, 
Burlington, Canton, Cohasset, Concord, Danvers, Dedham, Dover, Framingham, Hamilton, 
Hingham, Holbrook, Hull, Lexington, Lincoln, Lynn, Lynnfield, Manchester-by-the-Sea, 
Marblehead, Medfield, Melrose, Middleton, Nahant, Natick, Needham, Norfolk, Norwood, 
Peabody, Quincy, Randolph, Reading, Salem, Saugus, Sharon, Stoneham, Swampscott, 
Topsfield, Wakefield, Walpole, Waltham, Wellesley, Wenham, Weston, Westwood, Weymouth, 
Wilmington, Winchester, Winthrop and Woburn. 
SECTION 5. Said section 1 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out the definition of ''Fourteen cities and towns'' and inserting in place 
thereof the following definition:- "13 cities and towns", the cities and towns of Belmont, Boston, 
Brookline, Cambridge, Chelsea, Everett, Malden, Medford, Milton, Newton, Revere, Somerville 
and Watertown.  
SECTION 6. Section 7 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in lines 17 and 18, the words "the 14 cities and towns; (ii) the 51 cities and towns" 
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the 13 cities and towns; (ii) the 52 cities and 
towns. 

of 3 36  SECTION 7. Section 7A of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the words “14 cities and towns”, each time they appear, and inserting in place 
thereof, in each instance, the following words:- 13 cities and towns. 
SECTION 8. Said section 7A of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out the words “51 cities and towns”, each time they appear, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- 52 cities and towns. 
SECTION 9. Section 9 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the words “14 cities and towns”, each time they appear, and inserting in place 
thereof, in each instance, the following words:- 13 cities and towns. 
SECTION 10. Said section 9 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out the words “51 cities and towns”, each time they appear, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- 52 cities and towns.